Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-5,163
Violation; penalties.

Any violation of sections 81-5,158 to 81-5,162 is a Class V misdemeanor. In addition, the State Fire Marshal may impose a civil penalty of up to two hundred fifty dollars for each day a violation continues. Any violation shall also constitute grounds for revocation of a contractor certificate.

Laws 1997, LB 636, § 6.